Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.070

Account and record of cost.

Whenever the state or any municipality shall execute any public work by any means or method other than by contract or small works roster, it shall cause to be kept and preserved a full, true and accurate account and record of the costs of executing such work in accordance with the budgeting, accounting, and reporting system provisions prescribed by law for the state agency or municipality.

[ 1986 c 282 s 4; 1923 c 183 s 6; RRS s 10322-6.]

NOTES:

State auditor to prescribe standard form for costs of public works: RCW 43.09.205.